West Virginia, session 2026, HB5044.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. COUNTY COMMISSIONS GENERALLY. §7-1-5b. Rural county stabilization program. (a) State agencies shall provide simplified grant applications and multi-year funding options for eligible rural counties.(b) Counties may enter into shared-service agreements for administrative and grant writing and management functions.